translate/lexd/adj.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasAdj
wêх̌ч-патêwҷ:заброшенный
wêх̌ч-питêwҷ:заброшенный
wāда-δāδӣҷ:дающий_обещание
wāзāн:влажный
wāмдор:одержимый
wāнин:ивовый
wāнин:ивовый
wāрг-бу̊стин:овчинный
wāрганд:овечий
wāши:дикий
wāши:дикорастущий
wāши:дикий
wāғӣн:плаксивый
wāғӣҷ:крикливый
wāғӣҷ:плаксивый
wāғӣҷ:плаксивый
wāқм:скитающийся
wāқми:скитающийся
wаδордор:холмистый
wазāн:влажный
wазмдор:имеющий_вес
wазмин:беременная
wазмин:неудачный
wазмин:страшный
wазмин:трудный
wазмин:тяжелый
wазмин:тяжелый
wазндор:имеющий_вес
wазӣр:хитрый
wазӣфадор:обязанный
wайру̊н:испорченный
wайру̊н:неправильный
wайру̊н:разрушенный
wалwалāн:сверкающий
wалад:испорченный
wарδāн:толстый
wарам:опухший
wарам:опухший
wарвāн:кипящий
wарвāнд:кипящий
wарван:кипящий
wарванд:кипящий
wарванд:кипящий
wатани:отечественный
wафодор:верный
wахwодор:сырой
wахwойин:сырой
wеру̊н:испорченный
wеру̊н:неправильный
wеру̊н:разрушенный
wеру̊н:разрушенный
wи-йа́н-ги:остальной
wи-йа́н-ги:следующий
wи-йан-га:остальной
wи-йан-га:следующий
wи-йан-гад:остальной
wи-йан-гад:следующий
wиδордор:холмистый
wизенчоз:знающий
wизенчоз:знающий
wийêшдор:имеющий_корень
wийêшдор:имеющий_поддержку
wийêшин:с_развитым_корнем
wийêшин:сделанный_из_корня
wинӣҷ:хорошо_видящий_вдаль
wирох̌:с_белой_отметиной_на_лбу
wируси:русский
wирӡин:лохматый
wирӯйайеҷ:с_той_стороны
wистох:своевольный
wисӯлгāр:кокетливый
wитāр:усталый
wих̌тен:лохматый
wих̌тицин:сделанный_из_кустарника_ирги
wих̌ух̌чак:расчесанный
wихин-ҷабал:окровавленный
wихинин:кровавый
wоймадор:одержимый
wойманок:бешеный
wойманок:страдающий_эпилепсией
wох̌-тāжӣҷ:предназначенный_для_перевозки_сена
wох̌ин:травяной
wох̌хор:травоядный
wоқиф:осведомленный
wоҷигӯнā:всякий
wоҷигӯнā:странный
wу̊н-х̌ебӣҷ:для_взбивания_шерсти
wу̊нин:шерстяной
wу̊нин:шерстяной
wудабаро:умелый
wузбак:узбекский
wузбаки:узбекский
wуруси:русский
wусӯлгар:кокетливый
wух̌йор:в_сознании
wух̌йор:разумный
wӣс:выпученный
wӣс:лохматый
wӯвд-мêсту̊нҷ:семимесячный
wӯвд-мêстӣнҷ:семимесячный
wӯвд-салā:семилетний
wӯвд-солā:семилетний
āзоги:членский
āл:мягкий
āл:мягкий
āл-чӯɣ̌ҷин:решенный
āло:отличный
āмийатдор:значимый
āту̊ми:атомный
āх̌к:говорящий
āх̌к:разговоривый_человек
ɣ̌аласт:сверкающий
ɣ̌ач:мокрый
ɣ̌индор:женатый
ɣ̌инӡелак:вязкий
δêwганд:куний
δêɣ̌анд:куний
δêɣ̌ганд:куний
δêɣ̌ӡин:березовый
δêɣ̌ӡин:березовый
δêɣ̌ӡнин:березовый
δêдгар:драчливый
δêдманд:драчливый
δêрвманд:неуклюжий
δêрманд:неуклюжий
δāδāн:бодливый
δāδӣн:бодливый
δар:далекий
δар-δоδҷин:очутившийся_вдали
δеw:беспокойный
δеw-δикч:невежливый
δеwин:помешанный
δинду̊ндор:имеющий_зуб
δорг:тощий
δоргин:деревянный
δоргинак:деревянный
δох̌ц:грубый
δох̌цин:волосатый
δу-меθā:двухдневный
δу-меθинҷā:двухдневный
δу-меθӣнҷā:двухдневный
δу-рӯзā:двухдневный
δу̊н:хорошо_пропеченный
δу̊нҷ-хāрӣҷ:зерноядный
δу̊ғов:кислый
δубарā:двойной_ширины
δудин:дымный
δузивāк:двуличный
δузивāк:двуязычный
δумдор:затягивающийся
δумдор:хвостатый
δуст:замужем
δустаки:ручной
δустдор:имеющий_руку
δустдор:умелый
δуто:двойной
δуто:согнутый
δуто:сутулый
δутоҷāк:сложенный_вдвое
δӣ:нижний
δӣр:нижний
θêw-θêwак:яркий
θêwнак:малый
θух̌:легкий
θӣк:заика
θӣпцак:рассыпчатый
θӣрхор:жалкий
а-рāнгин:всякий
а-рāнғāҷ:всевозможный
а-рāнғāҷ-аθ:всевозможный
а-рангин:всякий
а-ранғāҷ:всевозможный
а-ранғāҷ-аθ:всевозможный
аwȥ:глубокий
аwал-баӡ:скороспелый
аwалӣн:первый
аwезу̊н:висячий
аwезу̊н:привязчивый
аwеҷ:вмешивающийся
аwеӡу̊н:висячий
аwеӡу̊н:привязчивый
аwз:глубокий
аwлӣйо:святой
аwобаланд:высокомерный
аwоздо́р:голосистый
аwғу̊ни:афганский
аwғу̊ни:афганский
аwӡ:глубокий
аɣ̌дал:способный
аɣ̌дал-мол:огромный
аɣ̌дар:способный
а́-рā́нг-аθ:разный
а́-ра́нг-аθ:разный
а́нга:другой
а́р-рā́нг-аθ:разный
а́р-ра́нг-аθ:разный
абади:вечный
абади:вечный
аблā:глупый
аблā:простоватый
аблок:истощенный
аботā:глупый
абох:бестолковый
абрадор:с_пришитой_с_лицевой_стороны_тканью
абрех̌умин:шелковый
абрех̌умин:шелковый
абридах:облачный
абтар:ленивый
авда-салā:семнадцатилетний
авда-солā:семнадцатилетний
агитāтори:агитаторский
агитāтури:агитаторский
аграну̊ми:агрономический
адwодор:имущий
адаби:литературный
аданг:прямой
адо:исключительный
адолатхо:справедливый
ажғолдор:семейный
азо́лаwу̊н:всякий
азор-ҷӯфи:очень_хитрый
азор-ҷӯфи:разный
азорсалā:тысячелетний
азорсолā:тысячелетний
азӣз:дорогой
айбдор:виновный
айбдор:виновный
айби:с_недостатком
айби:увечный
айбнок:виновный
аййор:хитрый
айодор:стыдливый
айор:хитрый
айоти:жизненный
акӣм:полезный
акӯмати:государственный
алами:печальный
алами:печальный
алафхор:травоядный
алафхур:травоядный
алйумӣнин:алюминиевый
аллā:пегий
алоw:крупноузорчатые
алоwаги:дополнительный
алойид:отдельный
алойидā:отдельный
алол:идущий_впрок
алол:подходящий
алол:съедобный
алол:честный
алол:правдивый
алол:разрешенный
алолкор:добросовестный
алпинӣсти:альпинистский
алтой:ловкий
алтой:ненасытный
алу̊мот:трудный
алумӣнин:алюминиевый
амwазм:одного_веса
амwазн:одного_веса
амwор:ровный
амали:практический
аматарафā:всесторонний
амбêх̌цин:арчовый
амбах̌цин:арчовый
амбех̌цин:арчовый
амбори:прочный
амйатдор:значимый
амоwоз:согласный
амсойаги:соседний
амтан:одинаковой_величины
амто:равный
аму̊мā:огромный
аму̊мā:опухший
амқад:одного_роста
амҷинс:однородный
амҷинц:однородный
амӣр:щедрый
анwор:ровный
анардор:искусный
анбах̌цин:арчовый
анга:другой
анги:другой
ангилӣс:английский
ангилӣси:английский
ангӯрδин:виноградный
андêғ:твердый
андарғамуч:упрямый
аноқ:ровный
аноқ:с_пустыми_руками
аноқ:ровный
апӯпакилло:совершенно_голый
апӯпакило:совершенно_голый
ар-гӯнā:разный
ар-мêстā:ежемесячный
ар-меθā:ежедневный
ар-моā:ежемесячный
ар-мойā:ежемесячный
ар-моҳā:ежемесячный
ар-рāнгин:всякий
ар-рāнғāҷ:всевозможный
ар-рāнғāҷ-аθ:всевозможный
ар-рангин:всякий
ар-ранғāҷ:всевозможный
ар-ранғāҷ-аθ:всевозможный
ар-хел:всякого_рода
ар-хелā:разный
арāй-торā:трехструнный
арāқин:потливый
арāқин:потный
араб:арабский
араби:арабский
араби:поарабски
арай-торā:трехструнный
аракатдор:энергичный
аракатдор:деятельный
арби:военный
арби:военный
арзандā:догадливый
арзандā:достойный
арзу̊н:дешевый
арзу̊н:дешевый
арзу̊н-боб:недорогой
арзу̊н-буо:недорогой
арзу̊н-буҳо:недорогой
арзун-бао:недорогой
арзун-баҳо:недорогой
армани:армянский
аростā:расстеленный
аррӯзā:ежедневный
артарафā:всесторонний
ару̊м:нечистый
ару̊м:запрещенный
ару̊м-пӯмак:лысый
ару̊м-пӯмак:с_редким_оперением
ару̊м-пӯнак:лысый
ару̊м-пӯнак:с_редким_оперением
ару̊мзодā:незаконнорожденный
ару̊ми:поганый
арӯзā:ежедневный
асал:сладкий
асли:настоящий
асли:похожий_на_когол
асли:настоящий
аслидор:благородный
аслидор:благородный
асоси:основной
атапур:полный
атапур:полный
атми:необходимый
афлок:худой
афлотӯн:находчивый
афранг:разнообразный
афтаги:еженедельный
афтаги:недельный
афтайи:еженедельный
афтайи:недельный
афтодā:старый
афтодсалā:семидесятилетний
афтодсолā:семидесятилетний
афтодум:семидесятый
афтранг:разнообразный
афу̊нат:хитрый
афғу̊ни:афганский
ах̌ибнӣнҷ:вчерашний
ах̌ибнӣнҷ:позавчерашний
ах̌к:говорящий
ах̌к:разговоривый_человек
ах̌ӣбну̊нҷ:вчерашний
ах̌ӣбну̊нҷ:позавчерашний
ах̌ӣбу̊нҷ:вчерашний
ах̌ӣбу̊нҷ:позавчерашний
ах̌ӣбӣнҷ:вчерашний
ах̌ӣбӣнҷ:позавчерашний
ах̌ӣбӣнҷ:позавчерашний
ахтā:кастрированный
аштодсалā:восьмидесятилетний
аштодсолā:восьмидесятилетний
ақêқ:нагой
ақêқи:действительный
ақêқи:действительный
ақилā:трудно
ақилā:трудный
ақилā:трудный
ақиқи:действительный
ақлā:трудно
ақлā:трудный
ақлā:трудный
ақлидор:умный
ақлидор:умный
ақу̊ни:справедливый
аққу̊ни:справедливый
аҷаб:удивительный
аҷаб:удивительный
аҷинā:сумасшедший
аҷойӣб:интересный
бêақл:неразумный
бêақли:неразумный
бêтарӣн:наилучший
бêф:здоровый
бāδ:бодливый
бāδ:зловредный
бāр:верхний
бāч-кāчдор:семейный
ба-wазм:выдержанный
ба-wазн:выдержанный
ба-wафо:верный
ба-wафо:верный
ба-wух̌:в_сознании
ба-wух̌:сознательный
ба-айбат:внушительный
ба-ақли:умный
ба-баракат:благословенный
ба-гандаги:плохой
ба-ганди:плохой
ба-даwлат:богатый
ба-дох̌т:прочный
ба-ебат:внушительный
ба-зеб:красивый
ба-зеб:красивый
ба-ибо:стыдливый
ба-йебат:внушительный
ба-йибо:стыдливый
ба-мêр:добросердечный
ба-мêр:милосердный
ба-мазā:вкусный
ба-мазā:вкусный
ба-парδā:скромный
ба-раwах̌:толковый
ба-раwах̌:удобный
ба-раwах̌:толковый
ба-раwах̌-рāнг:более_или_менее_надежный
ба-раwах̌-рāнг:более_или_менее_удобный
ба-раwих̌:толковый
ба-раwих̌:удобный
ба-раwих̌-рāнг:более_или_менее_надежный
ба-раwих̌-рāнг:более_или_менее_удобный
ба-раwоҷ:допустимый
ба-раот:удобный
ба-риwоҷ:допустимый
ба-салêқā:способный
ба-самар:зрелый
ба-самар:зрелый
ба-силêқā:способный
ба-сому̊н:спокойный
ба-тартӣб:аккуратный
ба-тиғйу̊н:рослый
ба-туғйу̊н:рослый
ба-ух̌:в_сознании
ба-ух̌:сознательный
ба-фāм:рассудительный
ба-фāнд:хитрый
ба-фиреб:хитрый
ба-фирих̌тā:спокойный
ба-қуwат:дюжий
ба-қуwат:питательный
ба-қуwат:сильный
ба-ҷафо:недоедающий
баадаб:вежливый
баафзол:способный
баақл:умный
бабаракат:благодатный
бад:плохой
бад:злой
бад-гуму̊н:подозрительный
бад-зорδ:ревнивый
бад-лāфч:с_некрасивыми_губами
бадwоймā:уродливый
бадам:сильный
бадандех̌:злонамеренный
бадах̌хи:бадахшанский
бадахлоқ:дурного_поведения
бадбахт:несчастный
бадбахт:хитрый
бадбахт:несчастный
бадбашар:уродливый
бадбу̊й:вонючий
бадбӯй:вонючий
бадгиму̊н:мнительный
бадгуму̊н:мнительный
бадгӣр:строптивая
бадгӯй:хулитель
баддил:зловредный
бадмиҷоз:грубый
бадму̊милā:грубый
бадмуу̊милā:грубый
баднāфц:прожорливый
баднамо:некрасивый
баднафц:прожорливый
бадноз:кокетливый
бадну̊м:имеющий_дурную_славу
бадрāг:неблагородный
бадраг:неблагородный
бадрӯй:с_некрасивым_лицом
бадсифат:недоброкачественный
бадсохт:некрасивый
бадсӯрат:некрасивый
бадтойифā:неблагородный
бадфêл:непослушный
бадфêл:норовистый
бадфаол:капризный
бадфуол:капризный
бадхати:черновой
бадхашм:гневный
бадху̊н:слабый
бадхур:отвратительный_на_вкус
бадчах̌м:зловредный
бадшакли:безобразный
бадқāр:злой
бадқāр:злой
бадҷāл:злобный
бадҷалӯбат:страшный
бадӡоw:неудобный_для_жатвы
базарб:сильный
баздал:запутанный
баздал:запутанный
базӯр:принудительный
байналхалқи:международный
байнулмилали:интернациональный
байнулмиллали:интернациональный
байнулхалқи:международный
бакал:годовалая
бакор:необходимый
бакор:необходимый
бакори:необходимый
бакори:необходимый
бакул:взрослый
балад:знакомый
балад:знающий
баламуч:упитанный
балан-қāд:рослый
балан-қад:рослый
балан-қу̊мат:высокий
баланд:высокий
баланд:громкий
баланд:высокий
баланд-пох̌нā:на_высоких_каблуках
баланд-қāд:рослый
баланд-қад:рослый
баланд-қу̊мат:высокий
баландпойā:с_высокими_ножками
баланпойā:с_высокими_ножками
балаҷӯбат:страшный
бало:некрасивый
бало:хитрый
балочин:тростниковый
балшаwӣки:большевистский
банд:арестованный
банд:загнанный
бандā:заложенный
баори:весенний
баорну̊нҷ:весенний
баорнӣнч:весенний
баору̊нҷ:весенний
бар-алло:известный
бар-дам:здоровый
бар-диру̊ғ:лживый
бар-дирӯғ:лживый
бар-дуру̊ғ:лживый
бар-дурӯғ:лживый
бар-тêпчак:закрученный
бар-тêпчак:закрученный
барwêзи:барвазский
барwахт:ранний
барwақт:ранний
баракат-йофтā:удачливый
баракатдор:удачливый
баракатдор:удачливый
баракати:благословенный
бараот:обеспеченный
бараот:удобный
бараҳот:обеспеченный
бараҳот:удобный
барзӣнак:запутанный
барзӣнак:обкрученный
баробар:равный
баробар:ровный
баробар:одинаковый
бародари:братский
барости:правильный
бартанги:бартангский
батқāр:злой
батқāр:злой
бахил:скупой
бахмалин:бархатный
бахмалин:бархатный
бахтдор:счастливый
бахӣл:скупой
бацик:маленький
бацикик:маленький
бачагу̊на:детский
бачадор:имеющий_детей
башāнд:красивый
башāнд:хороший
башāнд:хороший
башāнд:хороший
башшāнд:красивый
башшāнд:хороший
башшāнд:хороший
бағит:завистливый
бағӣт:завистливый
бақ:выпуклый
бақ:крупный
бақ:невысокий
бақ-ну̊л:с_загнутым_клювом
бақā:дородный
бақā:огромный
баққā:дородный
баққā:огромный
баӡот:неблагородный
бе-wêх:разоренный
бе-wафо:неверный
бе-wийêш:без_корня
бе-wилоғ:пеший
бе-wихин:бескровный
бе-wихин:бесстрашный
бе-wох̌:бедный_травами
бе-āд:безграничный
бе-δинду̊н:беззубый
бе-δӯд:бездымный
бе-адаб:невежливый
бе-айб:безвинный
бе-ангих̌т:беспалый
бе-андех̌ā:необдуманный
бе-асоб:бесчисленный
бе-бāрā:бесплодный
бе-бачā:бездетный
бе-белат:безбилетный
бе-бу̊н:безбородый
бе-бу̊н:безбородый
бе-виноw:подвижный
бе-гêв:без_рта
бе-гêв:грубый
бе-гино:невинный
бе-гуно:невинный
бе-дастā:безрукий
бе-дод:невоспитанный
бе-дод:без_отца
бе-дуқат:беззаботный
бе-замӣн:безземельный
бе-зив:бессловесный
бе-зирйот:бездетный
бе-зирйот:бездетный
